Maryland, session 2025, HB0386.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Agriculture
5–101.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Active ingredient” means:
(1) In the case of a pesticide other than a plant regulator, defoliant, or
desiccant, an ingredient which prevents, destroys, repels, or mitigates insects, nematodes,
fungi, rodents, weeds, bacteria, or other pests;
(2) In the case of a plant regulator, an ingredient which, through
physiological action, accelerates or retards the rate of growth or rate of maturation or
otherwise alters the behavior of ornamental or crop plants or their produce;
(3) In the case of a defoliant, an ingredient which causes the leaves or
foliage to drop from a plant; and
(4) In the case of a desiccant, an ingredient which artificially accelerates
the drying of plant tissue.
5–201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Certified applicator” means a person who is certified by the Secretary under
this subtitle.
(g) “Labeling” means all written, printed, or graphic matter:
(1) Accompanying the pesticide or device at any time; or
(2) To which reference is made on the label or in literature accompanying
the pesticide or device, except to current official publications of the:
(i) Environmental Protection Agency;
(ii) United States Departments of Agriculture, Interior, and Health
and Human Services;
(iii) State experiment stations;

HOUSE BILL 386 3
(iv) State agricultural colleges; or
(v) Other similar federal or State institutions or agencies authorized
by law to conduct research in the field of pesticides.
(l) “Pesticide” means any substance or mixture of substances intended for:
(1) Preventing, destroying, repelling, or mitigating any pest;
(2) Use as a plant regulator, defoliant, or desiccant; or
(3) Use as a spray adjuvant such as a wetting agent or adhesive.
5–210.6.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ACTIVE INGREDIENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 5–101 OF
THIS TITLE.
(3) “PFAS CHEMICALS” MEANS A CLASS OF FLUORINATED
CHEMICALS THAT:
(I) THAT CONTAIN CONTAIN AT LEAST ONE FULLY
FLUORINATED CARBON ATOM, INCLUDING PERFLUOROALKYL AND
POLYFLUOROALKYL SUBSTANCES; AND
(II) OF WHICH THE CHEMICAL COMPOSITION INCLUDES OF THE
PFAS PESTICIDES IS LIMITED TO:
1. R–(CF2)–CF(R’)R’’, WHERE BOTH THE CF2 AND CF
MOIETIES ARE SATURATED CARBONS;
2. R–CF2OCF2–R’, WHERE R AND R’ CAN EITHER BE F,
O, OR SATURATED CARBONS; OR
3. CF3C(CF3)R’R’’, WHERE R’ AND R”” CAN EITHER BE
F OR SATURATED CARBONS.
(4) “PFAS PESTICIDE” MEANS A PESTICIDE THAT HAS PFAS
CHEMICALS LISTED AS AN ACTIVE INGREDIENT ON THE LABELING.

HOUSE BILL 386
(B) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP AND MAINTAIN A LIST OF
EACH PFAS PESTICIDE THAT IS REGISTERED WITH THE SECRETARY IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBTITLE 1 OF THIS TITLE.
(2) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026 2032, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(I) POST THE LIST DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION ON
ITS WEBSITE; AND
(II) DISTRIBUTE THE LIST TO ALL CERTIFIED APPLICATORS.
(C) (1) BEGINNING JUNE 1, 2026 2032, A PERSON MAY NOT USE A PFAS
PESTICIDE LISTED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION:
(I) AT A HEALTH CARE FACILITY;
(II) AT A SCHOOL;
(III) AT A DAY CARE OPERATION;
(IV) FOR RESIDENTIAL LAWN CARE; OR
(V) FOR COMMERCIAL MOSQUITO SPRAYING OPERATIONS.
(2) BEFORE JUNE 1, 2026 2032, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOTIFY
ALL CERTIFIED APPLICATORS OF THE PROHIBITION IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(D) BEGINNING JUNE 1, 2027 2032, THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT REGISTER
A PFAS PESTICIDE FOR SALE IN THE STATE.
(E) BEGINNING JUNE 1, 2028 2032, A PERSON MAY NOT USE A PFAS
PESTICIDE IN THE STATE.
(F) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION AND AGREEMENT WITH THE
MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH, MAY LIST ADDITIONAL PFAS CHEMICALS
BASED ON:
(1) NEW AND EMERGING HEALTH IMPACT DATA; AND
(2) EVOLUTION IN THE NEEDS, USES, AND AVAILABILITY OF
ALTERNATIVES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.